California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(g) To the extent feasible, the director shall consult with representatives of commercial and recreational fishing associations and subsistence fishing communities regarding the extent and duration of a closure, testing protocols, and findings. If a spill or discharge occurs within the lands governed by a Native American tribe or affects waters flowing through tribal lands, or tribal fisheries, the director shall consult with the affected tribal governments.

(h) The director shall, and the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment may, seek full reimbursement from the responsible party or parties for the spill or discharge for all reasonable costs incurred by the department or the Office of Environmental
 Health Hazard Assessment, respectively, in carrying out this section, including, but not limited to, all testing.

(i) It is unlawful to take any fish or shellfish from any waters closed pursuant to this section or to otherwise violate any restriction imposed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 237, Sec. 1.   (SB 839)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5655.

(a) In addition to the responsibilities imposed pursuant to Section 5651, the department may clean up or abate, or cause to be cleaned up or abated, the effects of any petroleum or petroleum product deposited or discharged in the waters of this state or deposited or discharged in any location onshore or offshore where the petroleum or petroleum product is likely to enter the waters of this state, order any person responsible for the deposit or discharge to clean up the petroleum or petroleum product or abate the effects of the deposit or discharge, and recover any costs incurred as a result of the cleanup or abatement from the responsible party.

(b) An order shall not be issued pursuant to this section for the cleanup or
 abatement of petroleum products in any sump, pond, pit, or lagoon used in conjunction with crude oil production that is in compliance with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations.

(c) The department may issue an order pursuant to this section only if there is an imminent and substantial endangerment to human health or the environment and the order shall remain in effect only until any cleanup and abatement order is issued pursuant to Section 13304 of the Water Code. A regional water quality control board shall incorporate the department’s order into the cleanup and abatement order issued pursuant to Section 13304 of the Water Code, unless the department’s order is inconsistent with any more stringent requirement established in the cleanup and abatement order. Any action taken in compliance with the department’s order is not a violation of any subsequent regional water quality control board cleanup and abatement order issued
 pursuant to Section 13304 of the Water Code.

(d) The Administrator of the Office of Spill Prevention and Response has the primary authority to serve as a state incident commander and direct removal, abatement, response, containment, and cleanup efforts with regard to all aspects of any placement of petroleum or a petroleum product in the waters of the state, except as otherwise provided by law. This authority may be delegated.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Petroleum product” means oil of any kind or form, including, but not limited to, fuel oil, sludge, oil refuse, and oil mixed with waste other than dredged spoil. “Petroleum product” does not include any pesticide that has been applied for agricultural, commercial, or industrial purposes or that has been applied in
 accordance with a cooperative agreement authorized by Section 116180 of the Health and Safety Code, that has not been discharged accidentally or for purposes of disposal, and the application of which was in compliance with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations.

(2) “State incident commander” means a person with the overall authority for managing and conducting incident operations during an oil spill response, who shall manage an incident consistent with the standardized emergency management system required by Section 8607 of the Government Code. Incident management generally includes the development of objectives, strategies, and tactics, ordering and release of resources, and coordinating with other appropriate response agencies to ensure that all appropriate resources are properly utilized and that this coordinating function is performed in a manner designed to minimize risk to other persons and to the
 environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 68.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5656.

Any recovery or settlement of money damages, including, but not limited to, civil penalties arising out of any civil action filed and maintained by the Attorney General in the enforcement of this article shall be deposited in the Fish and Wildlife Pollution Account in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 720, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Shellfish Area Contamination [5669. - 5675.]

5669.

For purposes of this chapter, “shellfish” means any bivalve mollusk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

5670.

It is unlawful to take shellfish used or intended to be used for human consumption from any area from which it shall be determined, as provided in this article, that the taking of shellfish does or may constitute a menace to the lives or health of human beings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5671.

The State Department of Public Health may:

(a) Examine any area from which shellfish may be taken.

(b) Determine whether the area is subject to sewage contamination.

(c) Determine whether the taking of shellfish from the area does or may constitute a menace to the lives or health of human beings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 108.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5672.

Upon the determination by the State Department of Public Health that the area is or may be subject to sewage contamination, and that the taking of shellfish from it does or may constitute a menace to the lives or health of human beings, it shall ascertain as accurately as it can the bounds of the contamination, and shall post notices on or in the area describing its bounds and prohibiting the taking of shellfish therefrom.

The taking of shellfish from the area is unlawful after the completion of the publication of the notices as prescribed in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 109.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5673.

The fact of posting the notices shall be published once a week for four successive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the contaminated area is situated, if there is such a newspaper, and if there is none, then in such a newspaper published in an adjoining county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5674.

The State Department of Public Health shall enforce the provisions of this article, and for that purpose the inspectors and employees of that agency may enter at all times upon public or private property upon which shellfish may be located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 110.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5675.

If examinations are conducted pursuant to this article for purposes of certifying the quality of shellfish-growing waters, certification of water quality shall be commenced within 30 days, and completed within three months of the filing of an application by an aquaculturist.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Purification of Mollusks [5700. - 5702.]

5700.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 5670, 5672, 8341, and 9050, native and nonnative mollusks may be taken in Districts 12 and 13 and moved to other areas to be purified for human consumption under rules and regulations established by the commission. Those regulations may include, but are not limited to, bag limits, methods of harvest, and provisions for public use.

(b) Mollusks taken under this section shall not be used for human consumption unless that use is approved by the State Department of Public Health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 111.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5701.

(a) The State Department of Public Health may make sanitary surveys of mollusk-growing areas or may use sanitary surveys of mollusk-growing areas made by qualified state or county agencies, and based on that information may classify those areas for purposes of harvesting and moving mollusks that are to be purified for human consumption in accordance with Section 5700.

(b) The State Department of Public Health shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 112.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5701.5.

If examinations are conducted by the State Department of Public Health pursuant to this article for purposes of certifying the quality of shellfish-growing waters, certification of water quality shall be commenced within 30 days and completed within six months of the filing of an application by an aquaculturist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 113.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5702.

Any person who moves any native mollusks taken under regulations of the commission from Districts 12 and 13 for purposes of purification for human consumption shall pay a royalty, as the commission may prescribe, of not less than two cents ($0.02) per pound of mollusks so taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Trinity and Klamath River Fish and Game District [5800. - 5803.]

5800.

(a) It is unlawful to conduct any mining operation in the Trinity and Klamath River Fish and Game District between July 1 and November 30, except when the debris, substances, tailings or other effluent from those operations do not and cannot pass into the waters in that district.

(b) It is unlawful between July 1 and November 30 to pollute, muddy, contaminate, or roil the waters of the Trinity and Klamath River Fish and Game District, or to deposit in or cause, suffer, or procure to be deposited in, permit to pass into, or place where it can pass into, those waters, any debris, substance or tailings from hydraulic, placer, milling, or other mining operation affecting the clarity of those waters. The clarity of those waters
 shall be deemed affected when those waters at a point a distance of one mile below the confluence of the Klamath River and the Salmon River or at a point a distance of one mile below the confluence of the South Fork of the Trinity River and the Trinity River, contain 50 parts per million, by weight, of suspended matter, not including vegetable matter in suspension and suspended matter occurring in the stream or streams due to an act of God.

(c) It is unlawful, between July 1 and November 30 to carry on or operate any hydraulic mine of any kind on, along, or in any waters flowing into the Trinity and Klamath River Fish and Game District.

(d) Nothing in this section shall prevent the operation of a hydraulic mine where the tailings, substance, or debris, or other effluent from that mine does not or will not pass into the waters of the Trinity and Klamath River Fish and Game
 District, between July 1 and November 30, and any person, firm, or corporation engaged in hydraulic mining shall have the right until July 15 to use water for the purpose of cleaning up.

(e) Any structure or contrivance that is used to violate this section is a public nuisance.

(f) Any person, firm, or corporation that maintains or permits a structure or contrivance used in violating this section is guilty of maintaining a public nuisance.

(g) It is the duty of the district attorney of the county where the violation occurs or the acts creating the public nuisance occur to bring action to abate that nuisance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 114.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5801.

Section 5800 does not affect any other laws applying to the territory included in the Trinity and Klamath River Fish and Game District which relate to birds, mammals, and fish.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5802.

Section 5800 does not apply to the construction, repair, or maintenance of public works by the Federal or State Government, or any political subdivision thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5803.

No provision of this article is a limitation on the authority of the State Water Resources Control Board or any California Regional Water Quality Control Board to adopt and enforce additional discharge requirements or prohibitions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Dams, Conduits, and Screens [5900. - 6100.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5900. - 5904.]

5900.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Dam” includes all artificial obstructions.

(b) “Conduit” includes pipe, millrace, ditch, flume, siphon, tunnel, canal, and any other conduit or diversion used for the purpose of taking or receiving water from any river, creek, stream, or lake.

(c) “Owner” includes the United States (except that for the purpose of Sections 5901, 5931, 5933, and 5938, “owner” does not include the United States as to any dam in the condition the dam existed on September 15, 1945), the State, a person, political subdivision, or district (other than a fish and game district) owning, controlling or operating a dam or pipe.

(d) “United States” means the United States of America, and in relation to any particular matter includes the officers, agents, employees, agencies, or instrumentalities authorized to act in relation thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 867.)
-------------------------------------------

5901.

Except as otherwise provided in this code, it is unlawful to construct or maintain in any stream in Districts 1, 138, 112, 2, 214, 212, 3, 312, 4, 418,
 412, 434, 11, 12, 13, 23, and 25, any device or contrivance that prevents, impedes, or tends to prevent or impede, the passing of fish up and down stream.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 115.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5902.

In including the United States within the scope of this chapter the Legislature declares that it understands that the law and policy of the United States with respect to the development of water resources, the reclamation of land from flood and overflow, and in all other respects is to comply with state laws respecting water. The provisions of this chapter provide a procedure for the United States to comply with the provisions and policy of state law respecting its subject matter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5903.

The United States shall file with the commission pursuant to this chapter a separate application for each dam it proposes to construct or enlarge if an owner other than the United States would be required to file an application pursuant to Division 3 of the Water Code in order to construct or enlarge the same dam. The application shall be on forms provided by the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5904.

The application of the United States shall give the following information:

(a) The name and address of the owner.

(b) The location, type, size, and height of the proposed dam and appurtenant works.

(c) The storage capacity of the reservoir.

(d) Such other pertinent information as the commission requires.

(e) As accurately as may be readily obtained, the area of the drainage basin, rainfall, and stream flow records and flood flow records and estimates.

(f) The purpose for which the impounded or diverted water is to be used.

(g) Such other appropriate information as may be necessary in a given instance.

In instances wherein the physical conditions involved and the size of the dam are such as to render the above requirements as to drainage areas, rainfall, stream flow, and flood flow unnecessary, the commission may waive the requirements.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Dams and Obstructions [5930. - 5948.]

5930.

The department shall, from time to time, examine all dams in all rivers and streams in this State naturally frequented by fish.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5931.

If, in the opinion of the commission, there is not free passage for fish over or around any dam, the department shall cause plans to be furnished for a suitable fishway, and order in writing the owner of the dam to provide the dam, within a specified time, with a durable and efficient fishway, of such form and capacity and in such location as shall be determined by the department. Such fishway shall be completed by the owner of the dam to the satisfaction of the department within the time specified.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5932.

When all of the provisions of this article have been complied with, if in the opinion of the commission changed conditions make additional structures desirable for the free passage of fish, the department may make such additional structures and may expend such sums of money as it deems necessary for such additional construction, including the cost of insurance against any liability which the department may incur in connection with such structures.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5933.

Whenever an application for approval of plans and specifications for a new dam in any stream in this State, or for the enlargement of any dam in any such stream, is filed with the Department of Water Resources, pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3 of the Water Code, a copy of such application shall be filed by the applicant with the commission. If then the commission deems that the construction of a fishway over such a dam is necessary for the preservation and protection of fish, and that construction and operation of such fishway is practicable, it shall set a date for a hearing to be held within 90 days after filing of such application with the
 commission.

At such hearing the applicant shall be entitled to introduce evidence to show that construction of the fishway is not necessary or is not practicable, taking into consideration the height of the dam and the amount of water available.

If, after the hearing, the commission finds that the construction of the fishway is necessary and practicable it shall, within five days after such hearing, notify the applicant to that effect.

After notice from the commission that a fishway is required, it shall be unlawful to commence the construction of any new dam or the enlargement of any dam without first obtaining the written approval of the commission of the design for such a fishway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 304.)
-------------------------------------------

5934.

The commission or any party may, in any hearing, cause the deposition of witnesses to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for depositions in civil actions in the superior courts of this state under Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

5935.

The owner of any dam upon which a fishway has been provided shall keep the fishway in repair and open and free from obstructions to the passage of fish at all times.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5936.

It is unlawful to wilfully destroy, injure, or obstruct any fishway.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5937.

The owner of any dam shall allow sufficient water at all times to pass through a fishway, or in the absence of a fishway, allow sufficient water to pass over, around or through the dam, to keep in good condition any fish that may be planted or exist below the dam. During the minimum flow of water in any river or stream, permission may be granted by the department to the owner of any dam to allow sufficient water to pass through a culvert, waste gate, or over or around the dam, to keep in good condition any fish that may be planted or exist below the dam, when, in the judgment of the department, it is impracticable or detrimental to the owner to pass the water through the
 fishway.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5938.

Whenever in the opinion of the commission it is impracticable, because of the height of any dam, or other conditions, to construct a fishway over or around the dam, the commission may, in lieu of the fishway, order the owner of the dam completely to equip, within a specified time, on a site to be selected by the department, a hatchery, together with dwellings for help, traps for the taking of fish, and all other equipment necessary to operate a hatchery station, according to plans and specifications furnished by the department. After such hatchery has been constructed, the department shall operate it without further expense to the owner of the dam except as provided in
 Sections 5940 and 5941.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5939.

The hatchery, traps, and other equipment necessary to operate a hatchery station shall not be of a size greater than necessary to supply the stream or river with a reasonable number of fish. The owner of the dam shall permit the department to locate the hatchery, dwellings, traps, and other equipment upon any of the land of the owner of the dam upon a site or sites to be mutually agreed upon by the department and the owner of the dam.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5940.

If the owner of the dam generates electricity at the place of the dam, he shall furnish sufficient light, without charge, for the use of the hatchery.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5941.

The owner shall permit the use of water, without charge, to operate the hatchery.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5942.

The commission may, in lieu of a fishway, hatchery, dwelling, traps or other equipment necessary to operate a hatchery station, order the owner of the dam to plant, under the supervision of the department, the young of such fish as naturally frequent the waters of the stream or river, at such times, in such places, and in such numbers as the commission may order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5943.

(a) The owner of a dam shall accord to the public for the purpose of fishing, the right of access to the waters impounded by the dam during the open season for the taking of fish in the stream or river, subject to the regulations of the commission.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any impoundment of water by a dam that is wholly located on privately owned land that is primarily agricultural or residential in nature if the impounded waters are from a stream or river that is
 not naturally frequented by fish and if the dam does not prevent the free passage of fish over or around the dam. The Legislature finds and declares that this subdivision is intended to be declaratory of existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 273, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5944.

The owner of a dam is not liable in damages to any person exercising the right to fish, who suffers any injury through coming in contact with, or tampering with, any of the property of the owner of the dam.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5945.

The department may sell, at cost, to the owner of a dam, young fish ordered to be planted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5946.

(a) The provisions of Section 5938 shall not be applicable to dams constructed in District 412 after September 9, 1953.

(b) No permit or license to appropriate water in District 412 shall be issued by the State Water Resources Control Board after September 9, 1953, unless conditioned upon full compliance with Section 5937.

(c) Plans and specifications for any dam described in subdivision (a) shall not be approved by the Department of Water Resources unless adequate
 provision is made for full compliance with Section 5937.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 116.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5947.

It is unlawful for the owner of a dam in District 412 to release water from the dam, or any facilities for the generation of hydroelectric energy operated in connection therewith, in varying flows in such a manner as to destroy fish life below such release.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5948.

No person shall cause or having caused, permit to exist any log jam or debris accumulation or any other artificial barrier, except a dam for the storage or diversion of water, public bridges and approaches thereto, groins, jetties, seawalls, breakwaters, bulkheads, wharves and piers permitted by law, and debris from mining operations, in any stream in this State, which will prevent the passing of fish up and down stream or which is deleterious to fish as determined by the commission, subject to review by the courts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Conduits and Screens: Diversions Over 250 Cubic Feet per Second [5980. - 5993.]

5980.

This article shall apply only to conduits described in Section 5987, and conduits with a maximum flow capacity over 250 cubic feet per second of water.

In classifying conduits it is recognized that those involving the passage of water through power devices and those of large size tend to destroy fish in a greater degree than conduits of smaller size or different type.

If this section is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect the validity of the remainder of this article.

The Legislature hereby declares that the persons owning conduits referred to in this section shall be subject to the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5981.

(a) The department shall examine all conduits. If, in the opinion of the department, a screen is necessary to prevent fish from passing into the conduit, the department shall order the owner of the conduit to install a screen.

(b) Except as provided in Sections 5987, 5988, and 5989, one-half of the expense of constructing or installing a screen shall be paid by the owner of a conduit and one-half by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 47.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5982.

An order to install a screen shall be in writing, and shall specify the type, size, mesh, material and location of the screen, the time within which the screen shall be installed, and an estimate of the expense of installing the screen.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5983.

When an order is made to install a screen, the department shall pay the owner of the conduit upon whom the order is served one-half of the estimated expense of the construction or installation of the screen.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5984.

If the expense of constructing or installing a screen exceeds the estimated expense the department shall, upon written notification by the owner of the conduit, inspect the screen, and pay to the owner one-half of the amount estimated to be necessary to complete the construction or installation of the screen.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5985.

The owner of the conduit shall, within 10 days after completing the installation of the screen, return to the department any surplus money advanced by the department pursuant to this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5986.

All money paid by the department to the owner of a conduit pursuant to this article shall be paid out of the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5987.

The department shall not pay one-half of the expense of the construction and installation of any screen as provided in Sections 5981, 5983, and 5984 to any person engaged in producing, generating, transmitting, delivering, or furnishing electricity for light, heat or power.

If this section is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, the decision shall not affect the validity of Section 5981, 5983 or 5984, and the Legislature hereby declares that the persons mentioned in this section shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 5981, 5983 and 5984.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5988.

When a screen has been installed, the owner may, by written notice within 90 days after such installation, request the department to inspect the screen for the purpose of accepting it. Thereupon it is the duty of the department to inspect the screen, and if it has been installed in accordance with the order and plans and specifications agreed upon by the department and the owner as provided in Section 5992 or approved by the Department of Water Resources the department shall accept and approve the screen in writing. If, upon such inspection it appears that the screen has not been constructed and installed in accordance with such plans and specifications, the department shall, within 60 days after such inspection, notify the owner of any deviation from the order. Thereupon such deviation may be remedied within 90 days, and a further inspection requested.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5989.

After acceptance, should the screen fail to function in an efficient manner, no changes in conditions affecting its operation having occurred subsequent to the acceptance of the screen, the owner shall not be required to install a new screen. However, the department may install another screen at the sole cost and expense of the department of a type, size, mesh, and at a location agreed upon by the department and the owner, or approved by the Department of Water Resources, as provided in Section 5992 of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5990.

It is unlawful for the owner of a conduit to refuse, fail, or neglect to install a screen in compliance with an order from the department or to permit the screen to be removed or taken out of place, except for repairs or cleaning while water is running in the conduit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5991.

In lieu of the department’s ordering the owner to install a screen the department may, at its option, elect to construct and install the screen itself, in which event the type, size, mesh, and location of the screen and the time within which it shall be installed shall be determined as provided by Section 5992 of this code.

When the department elects to construct and install a screen, one-half of the cost of construction and installation shall be paid by the owner.

The department may pay the entire cost of the construction and installation of a screen from the Fish and Game Preservation Fund, in which case it shall, upon completion of the screen, notify the owner of the amount of one-half of the cost, and the owner shall, within 30 days thereafter, remit that amount to the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5992.

Any screen installed under any of the provisions of this article shall be reasonably adequate to prevent fish from passing into the conduit and not unnecessarily impede the flow of water or prevent the owner from diverting the amount of water he is legally entitled to divert.

The type, size, mesh, and location of the screen and the time within which it shall be installed shall be mutually agreed upon by the department and the owner of the conduit. In the event the department and the owner of the conduit cannot agree upon the type, size, mesh, and location of the screen and the time within which it shall be installed, such matters shall be submitted for determination to the Department of Water Resources whose decision thereon shall be final and conclusive.

If the owner and the department fail to agree upon the type, size, mesh, location, and time of installation of the screen within 60 days from the first submission of proposed plans and specifications by the department to the owner, either the department or the owner may submit such matters, in writing to the Department of Water Resources for final and conclusive decision, and it shall, within 60 days from such reference, render its decision in writing determining such matters.

The department shall maintain and keep the screen in repair, and shall quarterly notify the owner in writing of the cost thereof, and the owner shall within 30 days thereafter remit to the department an amount equal to one-half of such cost.

The owner shall operate and keep free from debris any screen installed, and shall quarterly notify the department in writing of the cost thereof, and the department shall within 30 days thereafter remit to the owner an amount equal to one-half of such cost.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5993.

Before the installation of any screen under the provisions of this article, the department and the owner shall enter into an agreement defining the method of determining the cost of maintenance, repairs, operation, and keeping the screen free of debris, which agreement shall provide that in the event either the department or the owner objects to such cost the matter shall be referred to the Director of General Services for his final and conclusive decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Conduits and Screens: Diversions Less Than 250 Cubic Feet per Second [6020. - 6028.]

6020.

This article shall apply only to conduits with a maximum flow capacity of 250 cubic feet per second or less of water, other than those conduits described in Section 5987.

If this section is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect the validity of Article 3 of this chapter and the Legislature hereby declares that the persons owning conduits referred to in this section shall be subject to the provisions of Article 3 of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

6021.

The department shall examine new or existing conduits, and may install, maintain, repair, and replace fish screens, bypasses, or other devices to prevent the passage of fish through a conduit, when in the opinion of the department such a screen or device is practical and necessary. The owner of a conduit shall grant to the department the right of access to the conduit for the installation and maintenance of the screen, and shall provide the department with an easement for a site for the installation of the screen or device deemed suitable by the department. The owner shall also supply sufficient water for a bypass to carry fish stopped by the screen or device back to the channel from which they were diverted, and an easement for the bypass channel, but such easement shall not require the acquisition or leasing of additional lands by the owner. No water for a bypass shall be required if the channel from which the water is diverted is dry or incapable of supporting fish life below the point of diversion.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

6022.

Sufficient water for a bypass shall be not to exceed the following:

(a) Diversions under three cubic feet per second capacity shall not be required to bypass more than 18 gallons per minute.

(b) Diversions of three cubic feet per second or more, but under 10 cubic feet per second, shall not be required to bypass more than 30 gallons per minute.

(c) Diversions of 10 cubic feet per second or more, but under 20 cubic feet per second, shall not be required to bypass more than 40 gallons per minute.

(d) Diversions of 20 cubic feet per second or over shall not be required to bypass more than one-half of 1 percent of the capacity of the diversion.

(e) Diversions built by the Government of the United States and requiring bypasses longer than one-quarter mile shall bypass such amount of water as is necessary to return fish to the permanent channel satisfactorily.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

6023.

(a) The department shall serve written notice upon each owner of its intention to install a fish screen.

(b) The notice shall describe the location of the screen, the access required, and the amount of water required for the bypass. The location of the screen may be described by the distance downstream from the intake or by another method.

(c) The notice shall be served upon the owner in duplicate.

(d) Once signed by the owner, the notice shall serve as an agreement to the installation of the screen or device, according to the terms set out in the notice.

(e) The signed agreement shall require the owner to render any assistance, other than mechanical repair or replacement of parts, necessary to keep the screen or device in satisfactory operating condition. The hiring of additional labor shall not be required for that assistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 118.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6024.
